Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2987.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-7.2-20.8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.2 entitled "Office
of Health and Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.2-20.8. Creditors.
Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, money in the
ABLE program shall be exempt from creditor process and shall not be liable to attachment,
garnishment, or other process, nor shall it be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by any legal or
equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of any contributor or beneficiary;
provided, however, that the state of residency of the designated beneficiary of an ABLE account
shall be a creditor of such account in the event of the death of the designated beneficiary. Upon
death of a designated beneficiary, an agency or instrumentality of the state shall not seek payment
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A from any ABLE savings trust account or its proceeds for benefits
provided to a designated beneficiary, except as required by federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004669
========